Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-904
Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission; members; qualifications; appointment; term; quorum; vacancy; compensation; expenses.

There is hereby established the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. The commission shall consist of three members to be appointed by the Governor. The director of the state geological survey shall serve the commission in the capacity as its technical advisor, but with no power to vote. Any two commissioners shall constitute a quorum for all purposes. At least one member of the commission shall have had experience in the production of oil or gas and shall have resided in the State of Nebraska for at least one year. Each of the other members of the commission shall have resided in the State of Nebraska for at least three years. Initially, two of said members shall be appointed for a term of two years each; and one shall be appointed for a term of four years. At the expiration of the initial terms all members thereafter appointed shall serve for a term of four years. The Governor may at any time remove any appointed member of the commission for cause, and by appointment, with the approval of the Legislature, shall fill any vacancy on the commission.

The members of the commission shall receive as compensation for their services the sum of five hundred dollars per day for each day actually devoted to the business of the commission. Such amount shall be adjusted on July 1, 2025, and on July 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the two-year period preceding the date of adjustment. In addition, each member of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with the carrying out of his or her duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 4, p. 902;

Laws 1979, LB 90, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 99;

Laws 2018, LB1008, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 50;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 33.